Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska39-1712
Resurvey; when ordered.

When by reason of the loss or destruction of the field notes of the original survey, or in cases of defective surveys or record, or in cases of such numerous alterations of any road since the original survey that its location cannot be accurately defined by the papers on file in the proper office, the county board may, if it deems it necessary, cause such road to be resurveyed, platted and recorded as provided in sections 39-1705 to 39-1707.

Laws 1957, c. 155, art. IV, § 12, p. 544.